Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.080

Estimated amount due paid in May and November installments.

The estimated amounts due by nonhigh school districts as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.545.070 shall be paid in two installments. During the month of May of the school year for which the amount is due, each nonhigh school district shall pay to each high school district fifty percent of the total estimated amount due to the high school district for the school year as determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.545.070. The remaining fifty percent shall be paid by each nonhigh school district to each high school district during the following November.

[ 1990 c 33 s 492; 1981 c 264 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.44.200.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 264: See note following RCW 28A.545.030.